District of Columbia statutes.
1-909.06

Reporting of participants’ benefit rights.

(a)

The Retirement Board shall furnish to any participant or beneficiary who so requests in writing a statement indicating, on the basis of the latest available information:

(1)

The total benefits accrued; and

(2)

The nonforfeitable retirement benefits, if any, that have accrued, or the earliest date on which benefits will become nonforfeitable.

(b)

A participant or beneficiary shall not be entitled to receive more than one report under subsection (a) of this section during any 12-month period.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 146, 45 DCR 4045
Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-785.6.
This section is referenced in § 1-909.05 and § 1-909.08.